Hawaii statutes.
[§586-12] Mutual protective orders.
No protective order shall be entered against the plaintiff in the same petition
unless:

(1) The respondent properly files a separate
petition; and

(2) The plaintiff has reasonable notice of the filing
of the separate petition. [L 2016, c 4, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next